Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-404
Incorporation; articles of incorporation; statement required.

A benefit corporation shall be incorporated in accordance with the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, but its articles of incorporation must also state that it is a benefit corporation.

Laws 2014, LB751, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB35, § 3.

Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.